Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297E.02, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Combined net receipts tax. (a) In addition to the taxes imposed under subdivision 1, a tax is imposed on the combined net receipts of the organization. As used in this section, "combined net receipts" is the sum of the organization's gross receipts from lawful gambling less gross receipts directly derived from the conduct of paper bingo, raffles, and paddlewheels, as defined in section 297E.01, subdivision 8, and less the net prizes actually paid, other than prizes actually paid for paper bingo, raffles, and paddlewheels, for the fiscal year. The combined net receipts of an organization are subject to a tax computed according to the following schedule: If the combined net receipts for the fiscal year are: The tax is: Not over deleted text begin $87,500deleted text end new text begin $100,000new text end deleted text begin eightdeleted text end new text begin threenew text end percent Over deleted text begin $87,500deleted text end new text begin $100,000new text end , but not over deleted text begin $122,500deleted text end new text begin $200,000new text end deleted text begin $7,000deleted text end new text begin $3,000 new text end plus deleted text begin 17deleted text end new text begin tennew text end percent of the amount over deleted text begin $87,500deleted text end new text begin $100,000new text end , but not over deleted text begin $122,500deleted text end new text begin $200,000new text end Over deleted text begin $122,500deleted text end new text begin $200,000new text end , but not over deleted text begin $157,500deleted text end new text begin $300,000new text end deleted text begin $12,950deleted text end new text begin $13,000new text end plus deleted text begin 25deleted text end new text begin 18new text end percent of the amount over deleted text begin $122,500deleted text end new text begin $200,000new text end , but not over deleted text begin $157,500deleted text end new text begin $300,000new text end Over deleted text begin $157,500deleted text end new text begin $300,000new text end deleted text begin $21,700deleted text end new text begin $31,000new text end plus deleted text begin 33.5deleted text end new text begin 26new text end percent of the amount over deleted text begin $157,500deleted text end new text begin $300,000new text end (b) Gross receipts derived from sports-themed tipboards are exempt from taxation under this section. For purposes of this paragraph, a sports-themed tipboard means a sports-themed tipboard as defined in section 349.12, subdivision 34, under which the winning numbers are determined by the numerical outcome of a professional sporting event. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end